Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2979
Contribution agreements.

(1) A contribution agreement entered into before formation of the limited cooperative association is irrevocable for six months unless:

(a) Otherwise provided by the agreement; or

(b) All parties to the agreement consent to the revocation.

(2) Upon default by a party to a contribution agreement entered into before formation, the limited cooperative association, once formed, may:

(a) Collect the amount owed as any other debt; or

(b) Unless otherwise provided in the agreement, rescind the agreement if the debt remains unpaid more than twenty days after the limited cooperative association demands payment from the party in a record.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 79.